Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1783.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1340(a.1) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1340. Antique, classic and collectible plates.* * *(a.1) Vintage registration plates.--In lieu of a special plate issued under subsection (a), the owner of an antique or classic motor vehicle may request permission from the department to display a vintage registration plate from the model year of the motor vehicle. The vintage registration plate shall be:(1) Provided by the motor vehicle owner.(2) A Pennsylvania registration plate issued between the years 1906 and [1976] 1999, or a later year as determined by the department.123456789101112131415161718 (3) Legible from a reasonable distance.The applicant shall provide information as the department may require for processing the request and a $75 application fee. The department may deny a request to use a vintage registration plate for cause.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1783PN2193 - 2 - 1234567